Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 27A Judicial Support Agencies and Personnel

27A.010.
Executive head of Court of Justice.

In accordance with Section 110(5)(b) of the Constitution of Kentucky, the Chief Justice of the Commonwealth shall be the executive head of the Court of Justice and shall appoint such administrative assistants as he deems necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 61, § 1.

27A.015.
Administrative office of courts — Compensation — Prohibition. [Repealed.]

27A.020.
Chief Justice — Delegation of functions.

The Chief Justice in his sole discretion may delegate the following functions to the administrative director of the courts or to his administrative assistants:

Perform administrative services for the Court of Justice and supervise its clerical and administrative personnel, and its accommodations;

Act as fiscal officer of the Court of Justice and in so doing shall:

Maintain fiscal controls and accounts of funds appropriated for the Court of Justice;

Review and audit expense vouchers of justices, judges, and employees of the Court of Justice. Upon approval, the Chief Justice shall submit the vouchers to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, which shall certify the same to the State Treasurer for payment;

Prepare all requisitions for the payment of state moneys appropriated for the maintenance and operation of the Court of Justice;

Prepare budget estimates of state appropriations necessary for the maintenance and operation of the Court of Justice and make recommendations in respect thereto;

Collect statistical and other data and make report to the Supreme Court relating to the expenditure of public moneys for the maintenance and operation of the Court of Justice and the offices connected therewith;

Ascertain the necessity for assignment of justices and judges as contemplated by Section 110(5) (b) of the Constitution, make reports concerning their performance of duties and certify the compensation payable to them;

Carry on a continuous survey and study of the organization, operation, condition of business, practice and procedure of the Court of Justice;

Collect and compile statistical and other data concerning the operations of the courts, and to this end may require all necessary reports from the courts and clerks thereof of this Commonwealth relating to rules, dockets, and business dispatched or pending in such courts;

Formulate and submit to the Supreme Court recommendations of policies for the improvement of the Court of Justice;

Provide for educational programs for the members of the Court of Justice;

Report to the General Assembly concerning the work of the Court of Justice and make such recommendations for the improvement of administration of justice as deemed necessary and proper;

Supervise, operate, and administer all pretrial release programs and personnel which come within the purview of the Court of Justice, or which are related thereto;

Perform such other functions as may be assigned by the Chief Justice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 61, § 3.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

An Overview of Kentucky’s New Court System,
Vol. 41, No. 2, April 1977 Ky. Bench & B. 13.

27A.050.
Administrative Office of Courts — Appointment of director — Compensation — Prohibition.

The Administrative Office of the Courts is created to serve as the staff for the Chief Justice in executing the policies and programs of the Court of Justice. The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, employees thereof, and administrative assistants of the Chief Justice shall serve at the pleasure of the Chief Justice. Provided, however, the director shall be appointed or reappointed at least every four (4) years with the advice and consent of the Senate; but if the Senate is not in session when a term expires or a vacancy occurs, the Chief Justice shall make the appointment to take effect at once, subject to the approval of the Senate when convened. The salaries of the director, employees thereof, and administrative assistants of the Chief Justice shall be fixed by order of the Chief Justice and paid monthly or at such other periods as may be consonant with the policy applicable to payment of salaries of state employees out of the State Treasury. While holding their positions the director, employees of the office and administrative assistants shall not practice law in any court of this Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 33, § 1.

27A.052.
Circuit Court clerk salary account.

The Circuit Court clerk salary account is created as a trust and agency account in the State Treasury to be administered by the Administrative Office of the Courts. The account shall consist of the portion of fees directed to the account under KRS

186.531

and any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purposes of the account.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the account not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the account shall become a part of the account and shall not lapse.

Moneys in the account shall be used for the purposes of hiring additional deputy circuit clerks and providing salary adjustments to deputy circuit clerks and are hereby appropriated for these purposes.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 22, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 37, effective March 27, 2020.

27A.060.
Administrative Office of the Courts to maintain list of organizations to which persons sentenced to community labor for driving under the influence may work.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall:

Maintain a list of eligible organizations for whom persons sentenced under KRS

189A.020

may perform community service work and which have agreed to make proper reports to the court.

Develop and distribute such forms as necessary to ensure compliance with the reporting provisions of KRS

189A.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 13, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Administrative Office of the Courts — Forms, § 7.00.

27A.070.
Administrative Office of the Courts to send notices of felony convictions to the State Board of Elections.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall send certified notices of conviction of a felony to the State Board of Elections within ten (10) days after the conviction becomes final, including the exhaustion of all appeals, with regard to any person before the courts of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

27A.080.
Juvenile court records to be deposited with Administrative Office of the Courts — Availability of records.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall be the primary repository of court records of juveniles charged with, arrested for, and against whom complaints have been filed, involving status offenses, public offenses, and youthful offender proceedings, together with all court records of the handling and disposition of those cases, and shall keep and maintain these records.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall make juvenile records available to the agencies and persons specified by law.

All courts, law enforcement agencies, prosecutors, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, except the Department of Public Advocacy, and other agencies holding records coming within the purview of subsection (1) of this section shall make them available to the Administrative Office of the Courts in the manner and at the times specified by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 358, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 79, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 99, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 110, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 167, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

27A.090.
Criminal records check performed for Justice and Public Safety Cabinet — Fee — Request conditions.

In any instance that the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet is required by statute to conduct a criminal records or background check, the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may contract with the Administrative Office of the Courts to perform that service.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall set a reasonable fee for a criminal records check conducted by the office in an amount no greater than the actual cost of conducting that criminal records check.

When another statute sets the dollar amount of the fee charged for a criminal records check conducted by the Administrative Office of the Courts, the office shall charge that fee.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall be required to accept a criminal records check request only when the request is made:

By letter, electronic mail, or facsimile transmission; or

In person.

The Administrative Office of the Courts may establish an escrow account for a person who frequently requests that the office conduct criminal records checks.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 283, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 111, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, relating to the creation and organization of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

27A.092.
Administrative Office of the Courts to provide Department of Kentucky State Police with information on applicants for and holders of concealed deadly weapon license.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall support the responsibilities of the Department of Kentucky State Police in the administration of KRS

237.110

by providing information:

Possessed by the courts with regard to the suitability of an applicant for a license under KRS

237.110

; and

Possessed by the courts which may result in the revocation or suspension of a license issued pursuant to KRS 237.110.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall transmit information regarding a licensee which may result in the revocation or suspension of a license issued pursuant to KRS

237.110

as soon as practicable.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall not conduct a National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS) check for the Department of Kentucky State Police.

For purposes of conducting the continual background check on licensees pursuant to KRS

237.110

, the Department of Kentucky State Police may provide a list of licensees to the Administrative Office of the Courts. The list of persons holding a license pursuant to KRS

237.110

shall be held confidential by the Administrative Office of the Courts and shall be used only for purposes specified in this section and KRS 237.110. Information regarding licensees or applicants for a license shall be transmitted only to the Department of Kentucky State Police and shall not be distributed to any other person or organization within or without the Administrative Office of the Courts or the Court of Justice. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit or limit the distribution of information to or about any person which is authorized to be distributed by law, but the fact that the person is an applicant for or holds a license pursuant to KRS 237.110 shall not be distributed.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 240, § 12, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 112, effective June 26, 2007.

27A.095.
Standard power of attorney regarding medical treatment and school-related decisions for a minor.

As used in this section, “medical treatment” means any medical, chiropractic, optometric, or dental examination, diagnostic procedure, and treatment, including but not limited to hospitalization, developmental screening, mental health screening and treatment, preventive care, pharmacy services, immunizations recommended by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices, well-child care, and blood testing, except that “medical treatment” shall not include HIV/AIDS testing, controlled substance testing, or any other testing for which a separate court order or informed consent is required under other applicable law.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop a standard power of attorney for the limited purpose of establishing authority to consent to medical treatment for a minor and to make school-related decisions for a minor.

The standard power of attorney developed under subsection (2) of this section shall be available through the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the office of the circuit clerk where the informal caregiver resides.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 198, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

27A.096.
Judicial guidelines for pretrial release of moderate-risk or high-risk defendants.

The Supreme Court shall establish recommended guidelines for judges to use when ordering pretrial release and monitored conditional release for defendants whose pretrial risk assessments indicate that they are moderate or high risk and would otherwise be ordered to a local correctional facility while waiting for trial.

The Supreme Court shall establish recommended guidelines for judges to use to determine whether defendants whose pretrial risk assessments indicate that they are moderate or high risk are eligible for pretrial supervision.

Judges shall consider the guidelines established by the Supreme Court pursuant to this section when setting terms of pretrial supervision.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 44, effective June 8, 2011.

27A.097.
Evidence-based practices to be used in supervision and intervention programs — Standards — Funding restrictions.

As used in this section, “evidence-based practices” means intervention programs and supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices that scientific research demonstrates reduce instances of a defendant’s failure to appear in court and criminal activity among defendants when implemented competently.

In order to increase the effectiveness of supervision and intervention programs funded by the state and provided to defendants, the Supreme Court shall require that a vendor or contractor providing supervision and intervention programs for adult criminal defendants use evidence-based practices.

The Supreme Court shall measure the effectiveness of supervision and intervention programs provided by vendors or contractors and demonstrate that the programs have a documented evidence base and have been evaluated for effectiveness in reducing a defendant’s failure to appear in court and criminal activity.

The Supreme Court shall require, at a minimum, the following:

A process for reviewing the objective criteria for evidence-based practices established by the vendor or contractor providing the program;

A process for auditing the effectiveness of the program;

An opportunity for programs that do not meet the criteria based on the audit results to improve performance; and

A mechanism to defund any program provided by a vendor or contractor that does not meet the criteria upon a second audit.

Beginning July 1, 2012, twenty-five percent (25%) of state moneys expended on supervision and intervention programs for pretrial defendants shall be for programs that are in accordance with evidence-based practices. Beginning July 1, 2014, fifty percent (50%) of state moneys expended on supervision and intervention programs shall be for programs that are in accordance with evidence-based practices. Beginning July 1, 2016, and thereafter, seventy-five percent (75%) of state moneys expended on supervision and intervention programs shall be for programs that are in accordance with evidence-based practices.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 49, effective July 1, 2013; 2012, ch. 156, § 11, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 69, § 8, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/1/2013). This statute was created by 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2, sec. 49, effective July 1, 2013, and subsequently amended by 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 156, sec. 11, effective July 12, 2012, and 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 69, sec. 8, effective June 25, 2013. In accordance with KRS

446.320

, the 2012 and 2013 amendments did not hasten the effective date of this statute because the General Assembly did not clearly indicate that such was its intention by a change in the effective date.

27A.098.
Annual report on state-funded crime reduction and recidivism reduction efforts.

The Chief Justice shall submit an annual report to the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary by November 1 of each year that provides information on state-funded crime reduction and recidivism reduction efforts, including participation in intervention programming, public safety outcomes, and cost effectiveness. The report shall, at a minimum, include:

The percentage of defendants on pretrial supervision who appear for court and do not commit a new crime;

The percentage of drug court clients who successfully complete drug court;

The percentage of drug court clients who are arrested, convicted, and incarcerated within six (6) months, one (1) year, and three (3) years of successful completion of drug court; and

The amount of restitution paid while in drug court.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 64, effective November 1, 2013.

27A.099.
Deferred prosecution — Application — Listing of persons with records sealed.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall create an application for use by a defendant requesting deferred prosecution under KRS

218A.14151

which shall include a space for the defendant to indicate all prior convictions and expungements.

The Chief Justice may authorize the Administrative Office of the Courts to develop, collect, and maintain a listing of persons who have had their records sealed under KRS

218A.14151

,

218A.275

, and

218A.276

. The list may be utilized by the courts and attorneys practicing in the courts to determine whether the person is eligible to participate in a deferred prosecution under KRS

218A.14151

or a treatment or recovery program under KRS

218A.275

or

218A.276

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 100, effective June 8, 2011.